Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-2314
Permanent surface, defined.

Permanent surface shall mean any ground that is covered by a hard, artificial, weatherproof material such as concrete, asphalt, or other similar artificial substance.

Laws 1994, LB 421, § 14.